Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Secretary of State shall  conduct a study of changes made by the
federal government to the United States Postal Service.
(2) The study conducted under this section must include an analysis of how any  changes
to the United States Postal Service may impact Oregon’s vote-by-mail system.
(3) The secretary shall  submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to elections,  and may include re-
commendations for legislation, no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
Passed by House June 3, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3474 (HB 3474-INTRO) Page 1